Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.20
Commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance; injunction; director; application; no bond required.

The director is hereby authorized to apply for and the court to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act, or any rules or regulations promulgated under the act, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. The injunction shall be issued without bond.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 20, p. 1046;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 20;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 38;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 27.
March 17, 2026